Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202083-1,112
Committed offender; eligible for parole; parole plan of offender.

(1) Each committed offender eligible for parole shall, in advance of his or her parole hearing, have a parole plan in accordance with the rules of the Board of Parole. Whenever the board determines that it will facilitate the parole hearing, it may furnish the offender with any information and records to be considered by it at the hearing.

(2) An offender shall be permitted to advise with any person whose assistance he or she desires, including his or her own legal counsel, in preparing for a hearing before the Board of Parole.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 43, p. 3095;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 41.